phonology/08_particles.xfst
!
! 08_particles.xfst - Article and Preposition Fusion
! Particle + particle combinations
!
! References: Joüon-Muraoka §11, GKC §§12-13
!

!
! ============================================================
! DEFINITE ARTICLE + PREPOSITIONS
! ============================================================

!
! ב + ה → בַ (patach)
define Beth_Article
  b:0 -> b:a || _ h:a .
  
! כ + ה → כַ
define Kaph_Article
  k:0 -> k:a || _ h:a .
  
! ל + ה → לַ  
define Lamed_Article
  l:0 -> l:a || _ h:a .

!
! ==================================================================
! CONJUNCTION + ARTICLE / PREPOSITIONS
! ==================================================================

!
! ו + ה → וַ (rare)
define Vav_Article
  w:0 -> w:a || _ h:a .

!
! ==================================================================
! CONJUNCTION + CONSONANT
! ==================================================================

!
! ו + ו → וּ (dagesh)
define Vav_Vav
  w:w -> wu || w _ w .

!
! ו + ב → וּב (with dagesh)
define Vav_Beth
  w:b -> wb || w _ b .

!
! ו + כ → וּכ  
define Vav_Kaph
  w:k -> wk || w _ k .

!
! ו + ל → וּל
define Vav_Lamed
  w:l -> wl || w _ l .

!
! ==================================================================
! RELATIVE PARTICLE + NOUN
! ==================================================================

!
! שֶה + noun → שֶׁ
define Relative_Fusion
  š:e h:0 -> š:e || š _ .

!
! ==================================================================
! INTERROGATIVE ה WITH NOUN
! ==================================================================

!
! ה interrogative before noun
define Interrogative_Fusion
  h:a -> h:0 || _ # .

!
! ==================================================================
! PREPOSITION + DEFINITE ARTICLE FUSION
! ==================================================================

define Article_Elision
  h:a -> 0 || [ b | k | l | m | š ] _ .

!
! ==================================================================
! MEM PREPOSITION VARIANTS
! ==================================================================

!
! מן variations
define Mem_Fusion
  m:n -> m || _ # .        ! מן at end
  m:0 -> m:a || _ h:a .   ! מ + article

!
! ==================================================================
! COMPOSE PARTICLE RULES
! ==================================================================

define ParticleRules
  Beth_Article
  .o.
  Kaph_Article
  .o.
  Lamed_Article
  .o.
  Vav_Article
  .o.
  Vav_Vav
  .o.
  Vav_Beth
  .o.
  Vav_Kaph
  .o.
  Vav_Lamed
  .o.
  Relative_Fusion
  .o.
  Interrogative_Fusion
  .o.
  Article_Elision
  .o.
  Mem_Fusion
;

regex ParticleRules;
